en: Nonpareil almonds
it: mandorle nonpareil

en: Marcona almond
it: mandorle Marcona

en: raw almonds, Natural whole almonds, Raw natural almonds
bg: сурови бадеми
da: rå mandel
de: rohe Mandeln
es: almendras crudas
hr: sirovi bademi
it: mandorle crude
pt: amêndoa crua, amêndoas cruas

fr: amandes biologiques
fi: luomumanteli, luomumantelit, luomu manteli, luomu mantelit
pt: amêndoa biológica, amêndoas biológicas

en: almond with skin
de: Mandeln mit Haut
es: almendra con piel, almendra piel
fi: kuorellinen manteli
fr: amande brute, amandes mondées, amandes brunes
hr: badem s kožicom
it: mandorla con buccia
nl: amandel met vlies
pt: amêndoa com pele, amêndoas com pele

en: almond without skin, Marcona almonds without skin, Peeled marcona almonds
da: smuttede mandler
de: Mandeln ohne Haut
es: almendra pelada
fi: kuoreton manteli
fr: amande émondée, amandes pelées, noyaux d'amandes, amandes blanchies naturelles
hr: badem jezgra, bademova jezgra
it: Mandorle pelate
nl: amandel zonder vlies
pl: migdały łuskane
pt: amêndoa sem pele, amêndoas sem pele, amêndoa pelada, amêndoas peladas

en: almond pulp
de: Mandelpulpe
es: pulpa de almendras
fr: pulpe d'amandes
hr: pulpa badema
it: polpa di mandorle
nl: amandelpulp
pl: masa migdałowa
pt: polpa de amêndoa, polpa de amêndoas

en: blanches almonds, almonds blanched
bg: бланширани бадеми
de: blanchierte Mandlen, blanchierten mandeln, mandeln blanchiert
es: almendras peladas
fr: amandes blanchies, amandes blanches
hr: blanšira bademe, blanširani bademi
it: mandorle sbianchite
pl: migdały blanszowane

en: raw blanched almonds
fr: amandes blanches crues
it: mandorle crude sbollentate

en: whole almonds
bg: цели бадеми
de: Mandeln ganz
es: almendras enteras
fi: kokonainen manteli, kokonaiset mantelit
fr: amandes entières, amandes complètes
hr: cijeli bademi
it: mandorle intere
pt: amêndoa inteira, amêndoas inteiras

en: powdered almonds
de: Mandelpulver
es: almendras en polvo
fi: mantelijauhe
fr: amande en poudre, poudre d'amande, amandes en poudre, poudre d'amandes
hr: bademi u prahu
it: mandorle in polvere
ja: アーモンドパウダー
nl: amandelen in poedervorm
pt: amêndoa em pó, amêndoas em pó
sv: mandelpulver

en: almond flour
bg: бадемово брашно
de: Mandelmehl
es: harina de almendra
fr: farine d'amandes
hr: bademovo brašno
it: Farina di mandorle
nl: Amandelbloem
pl: mąka migdałowa
pt: farinha de amêndoa, farinha de amêndoas

en: organic almond flour
da: økologisk mandelmel
de: Bio-Mandelmehl
fi: luomu mantelijauho
hr: bademovo brašno iz kontroliranog organskog uzgoja
it: farina di mandorle bio
nb: økologisk mandelmel
pt: farinha de amêndoa biológica, farinha de amêndoas biológicas
sv: ekologiskt mandelmjöl

en: ground almonds, almond meal
de: Erdmandeln
es: almendras molidas
fi: Jauhettua mantelia, jauhettuja manteleita, mantelirouhe
fr: amandes hachées, amandes moulues
hr: sjeckani bademi
it: mandorle macinate
nl: gemalen amandelen
sv: mandelkross

fr: amandes décortiquées
de: Mandelkerne
it: mandorle sgusciate

en: almonds pieces
de: Mandelstückchen, Mandelstücke, Zerkleinerte Mandeln
es: trozos de almendras, almendras en trozos
fi: mantelipala, mantelipalat
fr: éclats d'amandes
it: mandorle spezzate
nl: amandelstukjes
pl: kawałki migdałów
sv: mandelbitar

en: roasted almonds, dry roasted almonds
bg: печени бадеми, печени бадемови ядки
ca: ametlles torrades
de: geröstete Mandeln, Mandeln geröstet
es: Almendras tostadas secas
fr: amandes grillées
hr: suhi prženi bademi
it: mandorle tostate
nl: geroosterde amandelen
pt: amêndoa torrada, amêndoas torradas
ro: migdale coapte

en: flaked almonds
de: Mandelblättchen
es: almendras laminadas
fi: mantelihiutale, mantelihiutaleet, hiutaleeksi valmistetut mantelit
fr: amandes effilées
hr: bademi u listićima
it: mandorle a scaglie
ja: スライスアーモンド
nl: amandelschilfers, amandelschaafsel
pl: migdały w płatkach, płatki migdałów, migdały płatki
pt: amêndoa laminada, amêndoas laminadas

en: bitter almond
de: Bittermandeln
es: almendras amargas
fi: karvasmanteli
fr: amandes amères
hr: gorki badem
it: mandorle amare
nl: bittere amandel, bittere amandelen
pt: amêndoa amarga, amêndoas amargas
sv: bittermandel

en: sweet almond
de: süße Mandel, süße Mandeln
fi: makea manteli, makeat mantelit
fr: amande douce, amandes douces
hr: slatki badem
it: mandorle dolci
pt: amêndoa doce, amêndoas doces
sv: sötmandel